Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.079

Commercial fund-raisers—Application for registration or renewal—Contents—Fee.

An application for registration and renewal as a commercial fund-raiser must be submitted on the form approved by the secretary and must contain:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the commercial fund-raising entity;

(2) The name(s), address(es), and telephone number(s) of the owner(s) and principal officer(s) of the commercial fund-raising entity;

(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the individual responsible for the activities of the commercial fund-raising entity in Washington;

(4) The names of the three officers or employees receiving the greatest amount of compensation from the commercial fund-raising entity;

(5) The name and address of the entity that prepares, reviews, or audits the financial statement of the organization;

(6) A solicitation report of the commercial fund-raising entity for the preceding, completed accounting year, including:

(a) The types of fund-raising services conducted;

(b) The names of charitable organizations required to register under RCW 19.09.075 for whom fund-raising services have been performed;

(c) The total value of contributions received on behalf of charitable organizations required to register under RCW 19.09.075 by the commercial fund-raiser, affiliate of the commercial fund-raiser, or any entity retained by the commercial fund-raiser; and

(d) The amount of money disbursed to charitable organizations for charitable purposes, net of fund-raising costs paid by the charitable organization as stipulated in any agreement between charitable organizations and the commercial fund-raiser;

(7) The name, address, and telephone number of any other commercial fund-raiser that was retained in the conduct of providing fund-raising services;

(8) An irrevocable appointment of the secretary to receive service of process in noncriminal proceedings as provided in RCW 19.09.305; and

(9) Such other information the secretary deems necessary by rule.

The application must be signed by an officer or owner of the commercial fund-raiser and must be submitted with a nonrefundable fee established in RCW 19.09.062.

Commercial fund-raisers required to register and renew under this chapter must file a notice of change of information within thirty days of any change in the information contained in subsections (1) through (7) and (9) of this section.

[ 2011 c 199 s 10; 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 13; 2007 c 471 s 5; 1993 c 471 s 5; 1986 c 230 s 7; 1983 c 265 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 24.06.450.